Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska68-942
Investigation and prosecution.

(1) In any case involving allegations of civil violations or criminal offenses under the False Medicaid Claims Act, the Attorney General may take full charge of any investigation or advancement or prosecution of the case.

(2) The department shall cooperate with the state medicaid fraud control unit in conducting such investigations, civil actions, and criminal prosecutions and shall provide such information for such purposes as may be requested by the Attorney General.

Laws 2004, LB 1084, § 9;

R.S.Supp.,2004, § 68-1081;

Laws 2006, LB 1248, § 42.